Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 11
FORECLOSURE PROCEEDINGS

Editor's note:

Prior to the enactment of this part 11 in 1981, the substantive provisions of this part were contained in part 5 of article 1 of title 32.

Cross references:

For the authority of a county to sell property for nonpayment and purchase property on default, see § 30-20-617; for sale of tax liens, see article 11 of title 39.

31-25-1101. Legislative declaration.

This part 11 is intended to provide a summary method for the collection of delinquent assessments and shall be liberally construed in favor of the taxing authority and the grantee in any deed issued pursuant to its provisions. No collateral attack whatsoever shall be permitted by any court or tribunal upon the title thus acquired, whether said title is acquired by the taxing authority itself or by any other purchaser. All taxing authorities within the state of Colorado authorized to levy any special tax or assessment are hereby specifically authorized to take advantage of the provisions of this part 11 and to take, hold, and convey title to the property sold. Conveyances shall be authorized by order of the governing body of the taxing authority, without any other further formality or proceeding.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1618, § 21, effective July 1.

31-25-1102. Definitions.

As used in this part 11, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Costs" means all costs associated with the foreclosure of any lien for special assessments levied upon any property. "Costs" includes, but is not limited to, publication costs; costs of sale; service of process fees; title insurance costs including costs for foreclosure certificates or litigation guarantee certificates; if such special assessment had been certified to the county treasurer, a fee for the county treasurer equal to the amount specified in section 30-1-102 (1)(c), C.R.S.; and any general taxes due or past due on such property, all interest and penalties thereon, and any fees and costs associated therewith.

(1.5) "Property" means any property which is, by the laws of the state of Colorado or the charter of any municipal corporation organized under the constitution of the state of Colorado, subject to the levy of assessments for local improvements within any city, town, or other taxing district in the state of Colorado.

"Taxing authority" means the Colorado new energy improvement district created in section 32-20-104 (1), C.R.S., and any municipal corporation or taxing district organized under the constitution and laws of the state of Colorado with power to make local improvements therein and pay for the same by means of special assessments based upon benefits accruing to property within the municipality or taxing district by reason of such local improvement.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1618, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1249, § 2, effective March 17.

L. 90:

(1) R&RE, p. 1475, § 13, effective July 1; (1.5) added, p. 1475, § 14, effective October 1.

L. 2010:

(2) amended, (HB 10-1328), ch. 426, p. 2223, § 4, effective June 11.

31-25-1103. Property in default.

Whenever any property in this state is in default in the payment of any special assessment levied to pay the cost of any local improvement or any installment thereof or any interest thereon, the taxing authority which has levied said assessment may in its discretion foreclose the lien thereof by an administrative proceeding in the manner provided in this part 11.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1618, § 21, effective July 1.

31-25-1104. Action in rem - lien against property.

In any case of default as provided in section 31-25-1103, the taxing authority may institute a proceeding in the nature of an action in rem, in the district court of the county in which the property is situate, denominated "in the matter of the foreclosure of special assessments for (here insert the nature of the assessment)". In such proceeding, it shall not be necessary to name any property owner or other person.

The petition, when verified by any officer of the taxing authority, shall be deemed sufficient if it includes the following: The nature of the assessment, a list of the property in default, the amount of the delinquent assessment including accrued interest and penalties for nonpayment against each particular lot or tract, and a request that a date of hearing be fixed not less than twenty nor more than forty days after the filing of the complaint and that, unless good cause be shown to the contrary, the court will then enter an order fixing the amount of the delinquency and costs and authorizing the sale of the property for the payment of the amount so fixed.

In such proceeding, the taxing authority may act against all or any part of the property so in default and may elect to proceed with respect to any installment or installments in default or with respect to the entire assessment if the same is in default. The sale for any installment shall not extinguish the lien of any installment subsequently becoming due.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1618, § 21, effective July 1.

31-25-1105. Form of notice of hearing to authorize sale.

In any proceeding authorized by section 31-25-1104, upon filing of the petition, the clerk of the district court in which such petition is filed shall issue under the seal of the court a notice which shall be in substantially the following form:

:u000 "STATE OF COLORADO :u2460 )
:u2460 ) ss.
:u000 County of ..................................................................... :u2460 )
:u000 In the Matter of the Foreclosure of Special Assessments :u2460 ) :u2880 IN THE
:u000 for (here insert the nature of the assessment) :u2460 ) :u2620 DISTRICT COURT.
:u2460 ) :u2860 NOTICE
:u2460 )
:u000 To all Persons having any Interest
:u000 in the premises hereinafter described:
Take notice that (here insert name of taxing authority) has instituted a proceeding in this court for the purpose of foreclosing the lien of certain special assessments for (here insert nature of assessment) upon the following properties, situate, lying, and being in the County of .............., State of Colorado, the amount of the assessment for each separate parcel being set opposite the description of the various lots or tracts, to wit:
Description of Property: (insert description) Amount Due: (insert amount)
You will further take notice that on the .............. day of .............., A.D., 20......, at the hour of ............ o'clock .... M., at the Court House in the County of .............., Colorado, any person having any right, title, interest, claim, or demand in or to any of the above described property or any part thereof may appear and show cause, if any, why the court should not enter an order fixing the amount of the delinquency against each such piece of property in default, together with costs, and authorizing the sale of said property for such delinquency.
WITNESS the signature of the clerk of said court with the seal thereof hereunto affixed at his office in the County of .............., State of Colorado, this .............. day of .............., A.D., 20....
.................................................................
Clerk.
By .................................................................
Deputy Clerk."

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1619, § 21, effective July 1.

31-25-1106. Publication of notice - copy mailed.

The notice required by section 31-25-1105 shall be published twice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the proceeding is instituted. The fact of such publication shall be conclusively established by the publisher's affidavit of publication. The first publication of such notice shall be more than ten days and the last publication within five days before the date set for the hearing. In addition to such published notice, the clerk of the court shall mail a copy of such notice to each record owner of the property described in such notice and to every mortgagee, lien claimant, or other person having any right, title, or interest in or to said property as disclosed by the records on file in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the particular county. Copies of such notice shall be sent to such owners and persons at their last known addresses. If addresses of such owners and persons are unknown to the clerk, notices shall be directed to the post office nearest to the property described in said notice. Also, the clerk of the district court shall cause a copy of the notice to be served on some person occupying the property described in such notice, if there are any. The mailing and serving of notices shall be completed at least ten days before the date of the hearing specified in the notice. Affidavit thereof shall be filed in the clerk's office, which affidavit shall be prima facie evidence of the fact of such mailing and service.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1620, § 21, effective July 1.

31-25-1107. Objections.

Any interested person may file written objections to the foreclosure of such assessment lien, setting forth the grounds relied upon to prevent the sale of any specific property subject to the lien of such assessment.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1620, § 21, effective July 1.

31-25-1108. Procedure in court.

At the time specified in the notice, the court shall proceed to hear and determine all issues raised. If there are no objections, the petitioner shall only be required to establish that the assessment has been made, certified, and extended and that the payment of the same, or any portion thereof, is in default.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1620, § 21, effective July 1.

31-25-1109. Court to direct sale of property.

With respect to property concerning which there is no appearance or concerning which all objections presented are overruled, the court shall forthwith enter a final order fixing the amount of the delinquency and costs and directing the treasurer of the taxing authority to sell such property at a date not more than ten days after the entry of such order for the purpose of satisfying the same. No proceeding to review any order of the district court entered under the provisions of this part 11 for the sale of any property shall be commenced after thirty days from the entry of the order sought to be reviewed. No proceeding to review such order shall be permitted to interrupt or delay the sale of any property with respect to which no such proceeding has been commenced. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any person in interest who has not been given actual notice. No sale shall be stayed unless the applicant for review files a bond in the supreme court in a penal sum not less than the amount of the delinquent assessment, with the condition that the amount of said tax, together with costs, shall be summarily forfeited to the taxing authority if the ruling of the trial court is sustained, in which event payment under the bond shall constitute a payment of the delinquent tax. If order of sale is denied by the district court, the taxing authorities shall have the right to a review of the proceedings in the supreme court and shall not be required to file a bond therefor.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1620, § 21, effective July 1.

31-25-1110. Notice of sale.

Notice of sale shall be given by one publication in a newspaper of general circulation in such county, which notice shall be in substantially the following form:

"Notice of Sale of Property for Delinquent Special
Assessments (here insert nature of assessment).

The undersigned, Treasurer of the .............. of .............., in the State of Colorado, pursuant to an order of the District Court of the ........ Judicial District of the State of Colorado, within and for the County of .............., authorizing the sale of property for the nonpayment of special assessments levied for (here insert nature of assessment) in the amounts set opposite the description of the various lots and tracts, will on the ............ day of ............, A.D., 20......, at the hour of ........ M., sell at public auction at his office in .............. County, Colorado, the following described property, to wit: (here insert description of property and amount of assessment)

Description :u2360 Amount
....................................................
:u2360 Treasurer of .............................
:u2360 County, Colorado.
Dated .............., 20....."

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1621, § 21, effective July 1.

31-25-1111. Liens may be paid prior to sale.

At any time prior to the day of sale, any person having any right, title, or interest in or lien upon any delinquent property may pay the amount of all unpaid past-due installments with interest at the rate of one percent per month, or fraction of a month, on the amount delinquent, together with all penalties and costs, whereupon the owner of such property shall be restored to the right thereafter to pay in installments in the same manner as if default had not been suffered.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1621, § 21, effective July 1.

31-25-1112. Sale - certificate of purchase - filing.

At the time and place fixed in such notice, the treasurer of the taxing authority shall proceed to sell the property described in the notice and shall sell the same to the person who pays the amount fixed by the court and who further offers to accept the lowest rate of interest upon the amount so paid, which rate shall not exceed one percent per month. The treasurer may adjourn any such sale or cause the same to be adjourned from time to time by announcement at the time and place appointed for such sale. Without further notice or publication, such sale may be made at the time and place to which the same is so adjourned.

Upon the completion of any sale, the treasurer of the taxing authority shall execute and deliver to the purchaser a certificate of purchase in substantially the following form:

Certificates of purchase shall be filed in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county where the property is situated.

"Certificate of Purchase.

THIS IS TO CERTIFY that on the .............. day of .............., A.D., 20......, the following described property, to wit:

(Description of Property)

was sold to .............. for the nonpayment of a special assessment for (nature of assessment) in the sum of $ ........ . If such property is not redeemed within three years from the above date, a deed to said property will issue to said .............., or his heirs, executors, administrators, or assigns.
If redemption is made, the holder hereof shall be entitled to interest on said amount at the rate of one percent per month from the date of said sale to the date of redemption.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, I have hereunto set my hand at .............., Colorado, this ............ day of ............, A.D., 20.... .
.................................................
Treasurer of ............................"

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1621, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(3) amended, p. 709, § 7, effective July 1.

31-25-1113. Bonds applied to purchase price.

At any such sale, the purchaser, for the purpose of making settlement or payments for property purchased, shall be entitled to turn in or apply toward the payment of the purchase price any of the bonds or other securities which are made payable out of the proceeds of the assessments for the collection of which such sale is made, together with any matured and unpaid coupons, and shall be entitled to be credited therefor to the extent of the par value of such bonds and coupons. Such bonds and coupons so applied in payment by the purchaser shall be deemed to be paid to the extent of the amount so turned in.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1622, § 21, effective July 1.

31-25-1114. Treasurer may reject bids.

If at any such sale a sufficient bid is not made, the treasurer shall strike off the property to the taxing authority at the conclusion of the sale, issuing a single certificate of purchase therefor, describing therein all the property so stricken off.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1622, § 21, effective July 1.

31-25-1115. Property redeemable within three years - certificate.

Any person having any right, title, or interest in or lien upon any property sold has the right to redeem the property within three years after any such sale by paying the amount of the delinquent assessment with interest thereon at the rate of one percent per month or fraction thereof. Upon such redemption the treasurer shall issue a certificate therefor and shall call in and cancel the certificate of purchase theretofore issued. Certificates of redemption shall be filed in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county where the property is situated.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1622, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 710, § 8, effective July 1.

31-25-1116. Treasurer may issue deed - form.

Upon the expiration of the period of redemption, the treasurer shall issue deeds to purchasers or to the taxing authority. Any one deed may convey one or more parcels of land, whether the same are contiguous or not. The deed shall be in form substantially as follows:

"KNOW ALL MEN BY THESE PRESENTS: That I, .............., Treasurer of .............. in and for the County of .............., State of Colorado, did on the .............. day of .............., A.D., 20...., sell at public auction unto .............., the following described property in the County of .............., State of Colorado, to wit:

(Description of Property)

WHEREFORE, in full conformity with law, I do bargain, sell, convey, and quitclaim unto said .............., the aforesaid property.
TO HAVE AND TO HOLD the same unto the said .............., his heirs and assigns forever.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, I have subscribed these presents this .............. day of .............., 20.... .
.................................................
Treasurer of ............................"

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1622, § 21, effective July 1.

31-25-1117. Effect of deed.

All such deeds shall be duly acknowledged and when recorded shall be prima facie evidence in favor of the grantee named therein and of any person claiming by, through, or under him of the regularity of the assessment and the court proceedings, sale, and title of the grantee and after recording shall be prima facie evidence of the ownership by the grantee named therein of the property therein described, free and clear of all liens and encumbrances whatsoever, except the lien of general taxes or special assessments outstanding and unpaid at the time of issuing such deed and except the lien of any special assessment installment subsequently becoming due.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1623, § 21, effective July 1.

31-25-1118. Procedure not mandatory.

The proceeding authorized by this part 11 shall not be obligatory upon any taxing authority. Such taxing authority, at its election, may pursue any other remedy provided by law for the collection of delinquent assessments.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1623, § 21, effective July 1.

31-25-1119. Fifteen-year limitation.

No action shall be commenced to foreclose the lien created by any bonds or warrants issued pursuant to the making of any public improvement, including the establishment, widening, grading, paving, or other improvement of any alley, street, or road, special districts for internal improvement, local improvements by cities or towns, streets, sewers, district sanitary sewers, storm sewers, or subdistricts thereof, municipal special assessment, conservancy districts, or any other such improvement for which taxing authority is authorized by law to make assessments and collect taxes for the purpose of retiring said bonds or warrants, unless the action is commenced within fifteen years from the date of maturity of the last issue of said bonds.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 1623, § 21, effective July 1.